Utah statutes.
63B-4-201.   Legislative intent statements -- Capital facilities.
(1) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of Utah use
institutional and other funds to plan, design, and construct two campus child
care centers under the supervision of the director of the Division of
Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is
delegated by the director.
(b)  The university shall work with Salt Lake City and the surrounding
neighborhood to ensure site compatibility for future recreational development
by the city.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of Utah use
institutional funds to plan, design, and construct:
(a)  the Union Parking structure under the supervision of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director;
(b)  the stadium renovation under the supervision of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director;
(c)  the Huntsman Cancer Institute under the supervision of the director of
the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director;
(d)  the Business Case Method Building under the supervision of the director
of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director; and
(e)  the Fine Arts Museum expansion under the supervision of the director of
the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director.
(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Utah State University use
institutional funds to plan, design, and construct:
(a)  a student health services facility under the supervision of the director
of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director;
(b)  a women’s softball field under the supervision of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director;
(c)  an addition to the Nutrition and Food Services Building under the
supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director; and
(d)  a Human Resource Research Center under the supervision of the director of
the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director.
(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Weber State University use
institutional funds to plan, design, and construct:
(a)  a track renovation under the supervision of the director of the Division
of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is
delegated by the director; and
(b)  the Dee Events Center offices under the supervision of the director of
the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director.
(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Southern Utah University use:
(a)  institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an institutional
residence under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the
director; and
(b)  project revenues and other funds to plan, design, and construct the
Shakespearean Festival support facilities under the supervision of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority is delegated by the director.
(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Dixie College use institutional
funds to plan, design, and construct an institutional residence under the
supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.
(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Forestry, Fire,
and State Lands use federal and other funds to plan, design, and construct a
wetlands enhancement facility under the supervision of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director.
(8) (a)  As provided in Subsection 63A-5-209(2), the funds appropriated to the
Project Reserve Fund may only be used for the award of contracts in excess of
the construction budget if these funds are required to meet the intent of the
project.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(i)  up to $2,000,000 of the amount may be used to award the construction
contract for the Ogden Court Building; and
(ii)  the need for any funds remaining as of December 31, 1995 be reviewed by
the 1996 Legislature.
(9) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Ownership
Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building
Ownership Authority Act, issue or execute obligations or enter into or arrange
for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may be created
to provide up to $539,700 for the purchase and demolition of the Keyston
property and construction of parking facilities adjacent to the State Office
of Education Building in Salt Lake City, with additional amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(10) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the monies appropriated for
Phase One of the Remodeling/Life Safety Upgrades of the Browning Fine Arts
Center at Weber State University is to include design of full code compliance,
life safety, space necessary to maintain required programs, and seismic
upgrades.
(b)  The design shall identify the full scope and cost of Phase Two of the
remodeling for funding consideration in the fiscal year 1997 budget cycle.
(11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the fiscal year 1996 appropriation for the Davis County Higher Education
land purchase includes up to $250,000 for planning purposes;
(b)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, the Board of
Regents, and the assigned institution of higher education work jointly to
ensure the following elements are part of the planning process:
(i)  projections of student enrollment and programmatic needs for the next ten
years;
(ii)  review and make recommendations for better use of existing space,
current technologies, public/private partnerships, and other alternatives as a
means to reduce the need for new facilities and still accommodate the
projected student needs; and
(iii)  use of a master plan that includes issues of utilities, access, traffic
circulation, drainage, rights of way, future developments, and other
infrastructure items considered appropriate; and
(c)  every effort is used to minimize expenditures for this part until a
definitive decision has been made by BRACC relative to Hill Air Force Base.
(12) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building
Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, issue or execute obligations or enter into
or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may
be created, to provide up to $7,400,000 for the acquisition and improvement of
the Human Services Building located at 120 North 200 West, Salt Lake City,
Utah, with associated parking for the Department of Human Services together
with additional amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(13) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building
Ownership Authority, under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, issue or execute obligations or enter into
or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation interests may
be created to provide up to $63,218,600 for the construction of a Salt Lake
Courts Complex together with additional amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management lease land to the State Building Ownership
Authority for the construction of a Salt Lake Courts Complex.
(14)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents use the higher education design project monies to
design no more than two higher education projects from among the following
projects:
(i)  College of Eastern Utah - Student Center;
(ii)  Snow College - Noyes Building;
(iii)  University of Utah - Gardner Hall;
(iv)  Utah State University - Widtsoe Hall; or
(v)  Southern Utah University - Physical Education Building; and
(b)  the higher education institutions that receive approval from the Board of
Regents to design projects under this chapter design those projects  under the
supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.
(15)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Board of Regents may authorize the University of Utah to use
institutional funds and donated funds to design Gardner Hall; and
(b)  if authorized by the Board of Regents, the University of Utah may use
institutional funds and donated funds to design Gardner Hall under the
supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.
(16)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management use up to $250,000 of the capital improvement
monies to fund the site improvements required at the San Juan campus of the
College of Eastern Utah.
